Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 471.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding the lapse, suspension or revocation of a certificate, license,
permit or other form of authorization issued under this chapter, the  Oregon Liquor Control
Commission may:
(1) Proceed with any investigation of, or any action or disciplinary proceeding  against,
the person who held the certificate, license, permit or other authorization; or
(2) Revise or render void an order suspending  or revoking the certificate, license, permit
or other authorization.
SECTION 3.  ORS 279A.025 is amended to read:
279A.025. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) to (4) of this section, the Public  Contracting
Code applies to all public contracting.
(2) The Public Contracting Code does not apply to:
(a) Contracts between a contracting agency and:
(A) Another contracting agency;
(B) The Oregon Health and Science University;
(C) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(D) The Oregon State Bar;
(E) A governmental body of another state;
(F) The federal government;
(G) An American Indian tribe or an agency of an American Indian tribe;
(H) A nation, or a governmental body in a nation, other than the United States; or
(I) An intergovernmental entity formed between or among:
(i) Governmental bodies of this or another state;
(ii) The federal government;
(iii) An American Indian tribe or an agency of an American Indian tribe;
(iv) A nation other than the United States; or
(v) A governmental body in a nation other than the United States;
(b) Agreements authorized by ORS chapter 190 or by a  statute, charter provision, ordinance or
other authority for  establishing agreements between or among governmental bodies or agencies or
tribal governing bodies or agencies;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-B) Page 1
(c) Insurance and service contracts as provided for under ORS  414.115, 414.125, 414.135 and
414.145 for purposes of source selection;
(d) Grants;
(e) Contracts for professional  or expert witnesses or consultants to provide services or testi-
mony relating to existing or potential litigation or legal matters in which a public body is  or may
become interested;
(f) Acquisitions or disposals of real property or interest in real property;
(g) Sole-source expenditures when rates are set by law or ordinance for purposes of  source se-
lection;
(h) Contracts for the procurement or distribution of textbooks;
(i) Procurements by a contracting agency from an Oregon Corrections Enterprises program;
(j) The procurement, transportation , sale  or distribution of distilled liquor,  as defined in ORS
471.001, or the appointment of agents under ORS 471.230 or 471.750 by  the Oregon Liquor Control
Commission;
(k) Contracts entered into under ORS  chapter 180 between the Attorney General and private
counsel or special legal assistants;
(L) Contracts for the sale of timber  from lands owned or managed by the State Board of
Forestry and the State Forestry Department;
(m) Contracts for activities necessary or convenient for  the sale of timber under paragraph (L)
of this subsection, either separately from or in conjunction with  contracts for the sale of timber,
including but not limited to activities  such as timber harvesting and sorting, transporting, gravel
pit development or operation, and road construction, maintenance or improvement;
(n) Contracts for forest protection or forest  related activities, as described in ORS 477.406, by
the State Forester or the State Board of Forestry;
(o) Contracts entered  into by the Housing and Community Services Department in exercising the
department’s duties prescribed in ORS chapters 456 and 458, except that the  department’s public
contracting for goods and services is subject to ORS chapter 279B;
(p) Contracts entered into by the State  Treasurer in exercising the powers of that office pre-
scribed in ORS 178.010 to 178.100 and ORS chapters 286A, 287A, 289, 293,  294 and 295, including
but not limited to investment contracts and agreements, banking services, clearing house  services
and collateralization agreements, bond documents, certificates of  participation and other debt re-
payment agreements, and  any associated contracts, agreements and documents, regardless of
whether the  obligations that the contracts, agreements or documents establish are general, special
or limited, except  that the State Treasurer’s public contracting for goods and services is subject to
ORS chapter 279B;
(q) Contracts, agreements or  other documents entered into, issued or established in connection
with:
(A) The issuance of obligations, as defined in ORS 286A.100 and 287A.310, of a public body;
(B) The making of program loans and similar extensions or advances of  funds, aid or assistance
by a public body to a public or  private body for the purpose of carrying out, promoting or sustaining
activities or programs authorized by law; or
(C) The investment of funds by a public body as authorized by law, and other  financial trans-
actions of a public body that by their character cannot practically be  established under the com-
petitive contractor selection procedures of ORS 279B.050 to 279B.085;
(r) Contracts for employee benefit plans as provided in ORS 243.105 (1), 243.125 (4),  243.221,
243.275, 243.291, 243.303 and 243.565;
(s) Contracts for employee benefit plans as provided in ORS 243.860 to 243.886; or
(t) Any other public contracting of a public body  specifically exempted from the code by another
provision of law.
(3) The Public Contracting Code does not apply to the contracting activities of:
(a) The Oregon State Lottery Commission;
(b) The legislative department;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-B) Page 2
(c) The judicial department;
(d) Semi-independent state agencies listed in ORS 182.454, except as  provided in ORS 279.835 to
279.855 and 279A.250 to 279A.290;
(e) Oregon Corrections Enterprises;
(f) The Oregon Film and Video Office, except as provided in ORS 279A.100 and 279A.250  to
279A.290;
(g) The Travel Information Council, except as provided in ORS 279A.250 to 279A.290;
(h) The Oregon 529 Savings Network and the Oregon 529 Savings Board;
(i) The Oregon Innovation Council;
(j) The Oregon Utility Notification Center; or
(k) Any other public body specifically exempted from the code by another provision of law.
(4) ORS 279A.200  to 279A.225 and 279B.050 to 279B.085 do not apply to contracts made with
qualified nonprofit  agencies providing employment opportunities for individuals with disabilities un-
der ORS 279.835 to 279.855.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 471.037 is amended to read:
471.037. (1) As used in this section and ORS 471.268:
(a)(A) “Financial consideration,” except as provided in subparagraph (B)  of this paragraph,
means value that is given or received directly or indirectly  through sales, barter, trade, fees,
charges, dues, contributions or donations.
(B) “Financial consideration” does not mean any of the following:
(i) A tax deduction or credit for donating beer, wine  or fermented fruit juice to a nonprofit or-
ganization.
(ii) An event admission charge or club or organization dues, if the amount of  the admission
charge or dues is independent of the amount of  alcoholic beverages to be provided or consumed at
the event or through club or organization activities.
(iii) A prize awarded at a state  or county fair or other organized judging, tasting, exhibition,
contest or competition at which consumption of  a submitted beer, wine or fermented fruit juice is
without charge and only by the entrants, submitters, judges, exhibitors, contestants or competitors.
(iv) Homemade beers, wines or fermented fruit juices made by other persons.
(v) Beer, wine or fermented fruit juice ingredients.
(vi) Wages and salaries paid by an educational organization for  teaching brewing, winemaking,
fermentation science or fermentation processes.
(vii) The receipt of donated homemade beers, wines or fermented fruit juices  by a
nonprofit or charitable organization registered in this state for sale  at an auction under ORS
471.162 (6), or the proceeds received by the organization from selling those  donated home-
made beers, wines or fermented fruit juices at an auction under ORS 471.162 (6).
(b) “Homemade” means made for noncommercial purposes.
(c) “Noncommercial” means not  dependent or conditioned upon the provision or receipt of fi-
nancial consideration.
(2) Except  as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the Liquor Control Act does not apply
to the following:
(a) The making  of homemade beer, wine or fermented fruit juice, if the total of beer, wine and
fermented fruit juice produced during a calendar year does not exceed:
(A) One hundred gallons in a household having one person who is 21 years of age or older; or
(B) Two hundred gallons in a household having two or more  persons who are 21 years of age
or older.
(b) The keeping, storage or transportation of homemade beer, wine or fermented fruit juice.
(c) The possession of mash,  wort or wash, for the purpose of making homemade beer, wine or
fermented fruit juice.
(d) Except as provided  in ORS 471.268, the noncommercial consumption at any location of
homemade beer, wine or fermented fruit juice.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-B) Page 3
(3) Subsection (2)  of this section does not exempt any person from ORS 471.410, 471.430 or
471.432.
SECTION 5.  ORS 471.130 is amended to read:
471.130. (1) All licensees and permittees of the Oregon Liquor Control  Commission, before sell-
ing or serving alcoholic liquor to any person about whom there is any  reasonable doubt of the
person’s having reached 21 years of age, shall require such person  to produce one of the following
pieces of identification:
(a) The person’s passport.
(b) The person’s motor vehicle operator’s license[ , whether issued in this state or by any  other
state, so long as the license has a picture of the  person ] issued by this state or another state of
the United States .
(c) An identification card issued under ORS 807.400.
(d) A United States military identification card.
(e) An identification card issued by a federally recognized Indian tribe.
[(e)] (f)  Any other identification card issued by a state or territory of the United States that
bears a picture of the person,  the name of the person, the person’s date of birth and a physical de-
scription of the person.
(2) If a  person does not have identification as described in subsection (1) of this section, the
permittee or licensee shall require such person to make  a written statement of age and furnish ev-
idence of the person’s true age and identity.  The written statement of age shall be on a form fur-
nished or approved by the commission, including but not limited to the following information:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Date 
I am 21 years of age or over.
Signature
Description of evidence in support of age and identity:
 Identification No. (if any) 
 Identification No. (if any) 
(Fill in information pertaining to any two or more pieces of evidence submitted by the person.)
I hereby certify that I have accurately recorded identification of the evidence submitted  to
complete this form.
Signature of permittee or licensee
[ORS 165.805 provides as follows: ]
[165.805. (1) A person commits the crime of misrepresentation of age by a minor if: ]
[(a) Being less than a certain, specified age, the person knowingly purports to be of any age  other
than the person’s true age with the intent of securing a right, benefit  or privilege which by law is de-
nied to persons under that certain, specified age; or ]
[(b) (Not applicable.) ]
[(2) Misrepresentation of age by a minor is a Class C misdemeanor. ]
A person under 21 years of age who knowingly misrepresents the person’s true age with
the intent of obtaining alcohol in violation of ORS chapter 471 may be  subject to criminal
penalties under ORS 165.805.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
SECTION 6.  ORS 471.162 is amended to read:
471.162. (1) Hospitals, sanitariums, convalescent homes, rest homes, retirement homes  and facil-
ities for the care of the elderly that have  been licensed or registered by the state may sell and serve
alcoholic beverages to patients, inmates and residents, and to bona fide visitors and guests of pa-
tients, inmates and residents, without a license issued under this chapter. Facilities  authorized to
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-B) Page 4
sell and  serve alcoholic beverages without a license under this subsection may not sell or serve al-
coholic beverages after 10 p.m. except upon a physician’s prescription.
(2) A person who operates a private residence that is not a boarding  house but that accommo-
dates transient guests for a limited duration may sell and serve wine, malt beverages and cider to
registered overnight guests without a license. Facilities authorized to sell and serve alcoholic
beverages without a license under this subsection must have six or fewer guest units.
(3) A person who is an employee or agent of the holder of a license issued  under this chapter
that authorizes wholesale distribution  of alcoholic beverages may, on behalf of the licensee, sell al-
coholic beverages in factory-sealed containers to retail licensees and wholesalers.
(4) A  pharmacist licensed under the laws of this state may sell alcoholic beverages without a
license. Pharmacists may only sell alcoholic beverages under the provisions of this  section if the
alcoholic beverages are  drugs as defined in ORS 689.005. A pharmacist may sell alcoholic beverages
under the provisions of this  subsection pursuant to a prescription, in containers of not more than
one quart capacity.
(5) A wine collector, or the agent of a wine collector, may sell wine in factory-sealed containers
at auction without a license. Any wine sold under this subsection must have been held by  the col-
lector for at least a six-month period. A wine  collector must receive written approval from the
Oregon Liquor Control Commission before conducting a sale under this subsection. No more than
one sale in a 12-month period may be conducted by a wine  collector under the provisions of this
subsection.
(6) A nonprofit or charitable organization registered in  this state may sell wine, malt beverages
and cider, including but not limited to donated homemade malt beverages, wine and
fermented fruit juices,  and a total  of not more than four liters of distilled liquor, in factory-sealed
containers at an auction or through a raffle without  a license. The organization must receive writ-
ten approval from the commission before conducting an auction or  raffle under this subsection. The
organization may conduct no more than one auction or raffle under this subsection  in a 12-month
period. The auction or raffle may not have a duration of more than  one day. The organization may
sell under this subsection wine, malt beverages, cider and distilled liquor purchased by or  donated
to the organization.  Except for donated homemade malt beverages,  wine and fermented fruit
juices, the purchased or donated wine, malt beverages, cider and distilled  liquor must be imported
into this state by the commission or be  manufactured in or imported into this state under a brewery,
brewery-public house, distillery, grower sales privilege, winery or wholesale malt beverage  and wine
license.  As used in this subsection, “homemade” has the meaning given  that term in ORS
471.037.
(7) A manufacturer may sell proprietary or patent medicines, perfumes, lotions,  flavoring ex-
tracts, medicinal tinctures and other preparations unfit for beverage purposes without a license.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 471.200 is amended to read:
471.200. (1) A brewery-public house license allows the licensee:
(a) To manufacture on  the licensed premises, store, transport, sell to wholesale malt beverage
and wine licensees of the Oregon Liquor Control Commission and export malt beverages;
(b) To sell malt beverages manufactured on or off the licensed premises at retail for consumption
on or off the premises;
(c) To sell malt beverages in brewery-sealed packages at retail directly to the consumer  for
consumption off the premises;
(d) To sell on the licensed premises at retail malt beverages manufactured on or off  the licensed
premises in unpasteurized or  pasteurized form directly to the consumer for consumption off the
premises, delivery of which may be made  in a securely covered container supplied by the consumer;
(e) To sell wine and cider at retail for consumption on or off the premises;
(f) To sell for consumption off the premises wines and cider  in securely covered containers
supplied by the consumer and having capacities of not more than two gallons each;
(g) To conduct the activities, except manufacturing, described in paragraphs (a) to (f)  of this
subsection at one location other than the premises where the manufacturing occurs;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-B) Page 5
(h) To obtain a special events brewery-public house license entitling the holder to conduct  the
activities allowed under paragraphs (b) to (f) of this subsection  at a designated location other than
the location set forth in the brewery-public house license for a period not exceeding five days;
(i) To distribute malt beverages manufactured at the licensed  premises to any other premises
licensed to the same licensee, whether a manufacturer, wholesaler or retail premises; and
(j) To distribute for export, in any amount, malt beverages manufactured at the licensed prem-
ises.
(2) In addition to the privileges specified in subsection  (1) of this section, in any calendar year
a brewery-public house licensee may sell at wholesale and distribute to licensees  of the commission
no more than 7,500 barrels of malt beverages produced by the brewery-public house licensee.
(3) A brewery-public house licensee, or  any person having an interest in the licensee, is a retail
licensee for the purposes of  ORS 471.394 and, except as otherwise provided by this section and ORS
471.396, may not acquire or hold any right, title, lien, claim or  other interest, financial or otherwise,
in, upon or to the premises, equipment,  business or merchandise of any manufacturer or wholesaler,
as defined in ORS 471.392. A brewery-public  house licensee, or any person having an interest in the
licensee, is also a manufacturer for the purposes of ORS  471.398 and, except as otherwise provided
by this section and ORS 471.400, may not acquire or hold any right, title, lien, claim or other in-
terest, financial or otherwise, in, upon or  to the premises, equipment, business or merchandise of
any other retail licensee, as defined in ORS 471.392.
(4) A brewery-public house licensee, or  any person having an interest in the licensee, is a retail
licensee for the purposes of  ORS 471.398 and, except as otherwise provided by this section and ORS
471.400, may not accept directly or  indirectly any financial assistance described in ORS 471.398 from
any manufacturer or  wholesaler, as defined in ORS 471.392. A brewery-public house licensee, or any
person having an interest in the licensee, is also a manufacturer for the purposes of  ORS 471.398
and, except as otherwise provided by this section and  ORS 471.400, may not provide directly or in-
directly any financial  assistance described in ORS 471.398 to any retail licensee, as defined in ORS
471.392. The prohibitions on financial assistance in  ORS 471.398 do not apply to financial assistance
between manufacturing and retail businesses  licensed to the same person under the provisions of
this section.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection  (3) of this section, a brewery-public house licensee, or any person
having an interest in the licensee, may also hold a winery license authorized by ORS 471.223.  A
brewery-public house licensee, or any person having an interest in the licensee, may also hold  a
warehouse license authorized by ORS 471.242.
(6) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this  section, a brewery-public house licensee is eligible for
limited on-premises sales licenses and temporary sales licenses.
(7)[(a)] Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, [ and except as provided  in this
subsection,] a brewery-public house licensee, or any person having an interest in the  licensee, may
also hold a full on-premises sales license. If a person holds both a brewery-public  house license and
a full on-premises sales license, nothing in this chapter  shall prevent the sale by the licensee of both
distilled liquor and malt beverages manufactured under the brewery-public house license.
[(b) The commission may not issue a full on-premises sales license  to a brewery-public house
licensee under the provisions of this subsection if the brewery-public house licensee, or  any person
having an interest in the licensee or exercising control over the licensee, is a  brewery that brews more
than 200,000 barrels of malt beverages annually or  a winery that produces more than 200,000 gallons
of wine annually. ]
(8) Notwithstanding any other  provision of this chapter, a brewery-public house licensee, or any
person having an interest in the licensee,  may also hold a distillery license. No provision of this
chapter prevents a brewery-public house licensee that also  holds a distillery license from being ap-
pointed by the commission as the distillery’s retail outlet agent for  the purpose of selling distilled
liquors under ORS 471.230.
(9) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the commission by rule may authorize  a
brewery-public house licensee to coproduce special events with other manufacturers.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-B) Page 6
(10)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section,  a brewery-public house licensee may hold,
directly or indirectly, an interest in a manufacturer or wholesaler, provided  that the interest does
not result  in exercise of control over, or participation in the management of, the manufacturer’s or
wholesaler’s business or business decisions and does  not result in exclusion of any competitor’s
brand of alcoholic liquor.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section,  a manufacturer or wholesaler, and any officer,
director or substantial stockholder of any corporate manufacturer or wholesaler, may  hold, directly
or indirectly,  an interest in a brewery-public house licensee, provided that the interest does not re-
sult in exercise of control over, or participation in the  management of, the licensee’s business or
business decisions and does not result in exclusion of any competitor’s brand of alcoholic liquor.
(11) For purposes of ORS chapter 473,  a brewery-public house licensee shall be considered to
be a manufacturer.
SECTION 8.  ORS 471.223 is amended to read:
471.223. (1) As used in this section, “control” means that the licensee:
(a) Owns the brand under which the wine or cider is labeled; or
(b) Performs or has the legal right to perform all of the acts common to a  brand owner under
the terms of a trademark license or similar agreement that for the brand  under which the wine or
cider is labeled has a term of at least three years.
(2) A winery license shall allow the licensee:
(a) To import wine or cider in containers that have a capacity of more than four liters.
(b) To import wine or cider in containers  that have a capacity of four liters or less if the brand
of wine or cider is under the control of the licensee.
(c) To bottle, produce, blend, store, transport or export wines or cider.
(d) To sell wines or cider at wholesale to the Oregon Liquor  Control Commission or to licensees
of the commission.
(e) To sell wines or cider at retail directly to the consumer for  consumption on or off the li-
censed premises.
(f) To sell malt beverages at retail for consumption on or off the licensed premises.
(g) To sell for consumption off the premises malt beverages, wines and cider  in securely covered
containers supplied by the consumer and having capacities of not more than two gallons each.
(h) To conduct any activities described in paragraphs (a) to (g) of this  subsection at a second
or third premises as may be designated by the commission.
(i) To purchase from or through the commission brandy or other distilled liquors  for fortifying
wines.
(j) To obtain a special events winery license that shall entitle the holder to conduct  the activ-
ities allowed under paragraphs  (e) to (g) of this subsection at a designated location other than the
one set forth in the winery license for a period not to exceed five days.
(3) A winery licensee shall allow a patron to remove a partially consumed bottle of wine from
the licensed premises if the patron is not a minor and the patron is not visibly intoxicated.
(4) In order to hold a winery license the licensee shall:
(a) Possess at  a bonded premises within Oregon a valid producer and blender basic permit issued
by the federal Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau; or
(b) Possess a valid wine blender or valid wholesaler  basic permit issued by the federal Alcohol
and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau and have a written contract with a winery licensed under par-
agraph (a) of this subsection that authorizes the winery to  produce for the licensee a brand of wine
or cider that is under the control of the licensee.
(5) A winery licensee may sell and ship malt beverages, wine or cider directly  to a resident of
this state only if the licensee has a direct shipper permit issued under ORS 471.282.
[(6)(a)] (6)  [ Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, ] A  winery licensee, or any
person having an interest in the licensee, may also hold a full on-premises sales  license. If a winery
licensee, or a person having an interest in the licensee, also holds a full on-premises  sales license,
the provisions of this chapter do not prevent the licensee or person from both  selling wine or cider
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-B) Page 7
bottled and produced under the winery license and  selling alcoholic liquor as authorized under the
full on-premises sales license.
[(b) The commission may not issue a full on-premises sales license to a winery  licensee under the
provisions of this subsection if the winery licensee, or any person having an interest in the licensee  or
exercising control over the licensee, is a brewery that brews more  than 200,000 barrels of malt
beverages annually.]
(7) More than one winery licensee may exercise the privileges of a winery  license at a single
location. The commission may  not refuse to issue a winery license to a person for the production
of wine or cider on specified premises based on the fact that other winery licensees  also produce
wine or cider on those premises.
(8) If  a winery licensee does not possess at a bonded premises within Oregon a valid producer
and blender basic permit issued by the  federal Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau, the
licensee  may  exercise the privileges described in this section only for wine and cider brands that
are under the control of the licensee.
SECTION 9.  ORS 471.230 is amended to read:
471.230. (1) A distillery license allows the  licensee to import, manufacture, distill, rectify, blend,
denature and store [ spirits of] distilled liquor with an alcoholic content greater than [ 17] 10 percent
alcohol by [ weight] volume, to sell the [ spirits] distilled liquor to the Oregon Liquor Control Com-
mission and to transport the [ spirits] distilled liquor  out of this state for sale outside this state.
Distillery licensees may purchase and sell distilled liquor from or to another  distillery licensee in
containers having a capacity greater  than one U.S. gallon for blending and manufacturing purposes.
A distillery licensee may not sell any alcoholic beverage  within this state except to the commission
or as provided in this section. However,  any agricultural producer or association of agricultural
producers or the legal agents of an agricultural producer or association of agricultural producers
that manufactures and converts agricultural surpluses, by-products and wastes into denatured  ethyl
and industrial alcohol for use in the arts and industry  are not required to obtain a license from the
commission.
(2) If a distillery licensee holds a valid distilled  spirits plant basic permit issued by the federal
Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau for the licensed premises, the distillery licensee may:
(a) Permit tastings  of distilled liquor approved by the commission for sale in Oregon and man-
ufactured in Oregon  by the distillery licensee or by another distillery licensee. Tastings may be of
the distilled liquor alone or with a  mix of other liquids. If any of the other liquids are distilled liq-
uors, they must be distilled liquors on  the list of products approved by the commission for retail sale
in Oregon and must be purchased by the licensee at the retail price established by  the commission.
This paragraph does not authorize  sales by the drink of distilled liquor. The tastings may be con-
ducted on the licensed  premises of the distillery and at no more than five other premises owned or
leased by the licensee. The commission may  allow more than one distillery licensee to use the same
premises at the same time for conducting  tastings if the premises are a primary production location
and the licensees share the premises or  are owned by the same entity. If the manufacturer of the
distilled liquor obtains  distilled liquor for conducting tastings from the inventory of the commission,
the licensee shall pay the commission a processing fee.
(b) Obtain a special events distillery license.
(c) Apply for appointment by the  commission as a distillery retail outlet agent for purposes of
retailing distilled liquor at locations where tastings are permitted under paragraph (a)  of this sub-
section or subsection (4)(a) of this section.  A distillery retail outlet agent may sell at locations
where tastings are allowed under paragraph (a) of this subsection only distilled liquor that is  on the
list of products approved by the commission for retail  sale in Oregon and is manufactured in Oregon
by the distillery licensee or by another distillery licensee that uses the  same premises as a primary
production location or is owned by the same entity as the distillery licensee.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 471.392  to 471.400, a distillery licensee may also hold a full on-premises
sales license for a location at the licensed premises of the distillery  and a full on-premises sales li-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-B) Page 8
cense for one other location.  All distilled [ spirits] liquor sold under the full on-premises sales license
must be purchased from the commission.
(4) A distillery licensee that holds a  special events distillery license may conduct an event on
premises designated in the special events distillery license. Except as provided in this  subsection,
a special events distillery license may be valid for a period not exceeding five days.  The commission
shall limit the approval of special events distillery licenses for a distillery licensee at  the same lo-
cation to not more than 62 days during a calendar year. A distillery licensee conducting a  special
event may:
(a) Permit tastings  of distilled liquor approved by the commission for sale in Oregon and man-
ufactured in Oregon by the distillery licensee. Tastings may be of the distilled liquor alone  or with
a mix of other liquids. If any of the other liquids are distilled liquors, they  must be distilled liquors
on the list of products approved by  the commission for retail sale in Oregon and must be purchased
by the licensee at the retail price established by the commission. If the manufacturer  of the distilled
liquor obtains distilled liquor for conducting tastings from  the inventory of the commission, the
licensee shall pay the commission a processing fee.
(b) Permit sales by the drink of distilled liquor. A  drink that a distillery licensee sells under this
paragraph must include distilled liquor that the licensee manufactured  in Oregon. Any distilled liq-
uor contained in the drink  must be on the list of products approved by the commission for retail sale
in Oregon.  The distillery licensee selling the drink must purchase all distilled liquor contained in
the drink at the retail price set by the commission for the month in which the drink is sold.
(c) If the distillery licensee has  been appointed as a distillery retail outlet agent under sub-
section (2)(c) of this section, sell  distilled liquor in factory-sealed containers for consumption off the
licensed premises. A distillery  retail outlet agent may sell at a location where tastings are allowed
under paragraph (a) of this  subsection only distilled liquor that is on the list of products approved
by the commission for retail  sale in Oregon and is manufactured in Oregon by the distillery licensee.
The distillery retail outlet agent must sell the distilled liquor at the retail price  set by the com-
mission for the month of sale.
SECTION 10.  ORS 471.292 is amended to read:
471.292. (1) A license granted under  the Liquor Control Act [ or the Oregon Distilled Liquor
Control Act ] shall:
(a) Be a purely personal privilege.
(b) Be valid for the period stated in the license.
(c) Be renewable in the manner provided in ORS  471.311, except for a cause which would be
grounds for refusal to issue such license under ORS 471.313.
(d) Be [ revocable or suspendible ] subject to cancellation, suspension or  restriction  as pro-
vided in ORS 471.315.
(e) Be transferable  from the place for which the license was originally issued to another location
subject to the provisions of the Liquor Control  Act, [ the Oregon Distilled Liquor Control Act, ] any
rules of the Oregon Liquor Control Commission and any municipal ordinance or local regulation.
(f) Cease upon the death of the licensee, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(g) Not constitute property.
(h) Not be alienable.
(i) Not be subject to attachment or execution.
(j) Not descend by the laws of testate or intestate devolution.
(2) The commission may, by order, provide for the manner and conditions under which:
(a) Alcoholic liquors  left by any deceased, insolvent or bankrupt person or licensee, or subject
to a security interest, may be foreclosed, sold under execution or otherwise disposed of.
(b) The business of any deceased,  insolvent or bankrupt licensee may be operated for a reason-
able period following the death, insolvency or bankruptcy.
(c) A business licensed pursuant to this chapter subject  to a security interest may be continued
in business by a secured  party as defined in ORS 79.0102 for a reasonable period after default on
the indebtedness by the debtor.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-B) Page 9
(d) A license granted under this chapter may be transferred  from the place for which the license
was originally issued to another location.
SECTION 11.  ORS 471.313 is amended to read:
471.313. The Oregon Liquor Control Commission may refuse to  issue  a  license , or may issue
a restricted license, to  any applicant under the provisions of this chapter if the commission has
reasonable ground to believe any of the following to be true:
(1) That there  are sufficient licensed premises in the locality set out in the application, or that
the granting of a license in the locality set out in the application is  not demanded by public interest
or convenience. In determining whether  there are sufficient licensed premises in the locality, the
commission shall consider seasonal fluctuations in the  population of the locality and shall ensure
that there are adequate licensed premises to serve  the needs of the locality during the peak seasons.
(2) That the applicant has  not furnished an acceptable bond as required by ORS 471.311 or is
not maintaining the insurance or bond required by ORS 471.168.
(3) That, except as allowed by ORS 471.392 to 471.400, any applicant to sell at retail for con-
sumption on the premises has been  financed or furnished with money or property by, or has any
connection with, or is a manufacturer of, or wholesale dealer in, alcoholic liquor.
(4) That the applicant:
(a) Is in the  habit of using alcoholic beverages, habit-forming drugs or controlled substances to
excess.
(b) Has made false statements to the commission.
(c) Is incompetent or physically unable to carry on the management of the establishment pro-
posed to be licensed.
(d) Has been convicted of  violating a general or local law of this state or another state, or of
violating a federal law, if the conviction is substantially related to the fitness and  ability of the
applicant to lawfully carry out activities under the license.
(e) Has maintained an insanitary establishment.
(f) Is not of good repute and moral character.
(g) Did not have a good record of compliance with the alcoholic liquor laws of  this state and
the rules of the commission when previously licensed.
(h) Is not the legitimate owner of the business  proposed to be licensed, or other persons have
ownership interests in the business which have not been disclosed.
(i) Is not possessed of  or has not demonstrated financial responsibility sufficient to adequately
meet the requirements of the business proposed to be licensed.
(j) Is unable to read or write the English language or to understand the laws of Oregon  relating
to alcoholic liquor or the rules of the commission.
(5) That there is a history of  serious and persistent problems involving disturbances, lewd or
unlawful activities or noise either in the premises proposed to  be licensed or involving patrons of
the establishment in the immediate vicinity of  the premises if the activities in the immediate vicinity
of the premises are related to the sale or service of alcohol under the exercise of the  license privi-
lege. Behavior which is grounds for refusal of  a license under this section, where so related to the
sale or service of alcohol,  includes, but is not limited to obtrusive or excessive noise, music or sound
vibrations; public drunkenness; fights; altercations;  harassment; unlawful drug sales; alcohol or re-
lated litter; trespassing on private property; and public  urination. Histories from premises currently
or previously operated by the applicant may be considered when reasonable  inference may be made
that similar activities will occur as to the premises proposed to be licensed. The applicant may
overcome the history by showing  that the problems are not serious or persistent or that the appli-
cant demonstrates a willingness and ability to control adequately the premises  proposed to be li-
censed  and  patrons’ behavior in the immediate vicinity of the premises which is related to the
licensee’s sale or service of alcohol under the licensee’s exercise of the license privilege.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 471.315 is amended to read:
471.315. (1)  The Oregon Liquor Control Commission may cancel , [ or] suspend , restrict or re-
quire mandatory training for  any license issued under this chapter, or  impose a civil penalty in
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-B) Page 10
lieu of  or in addition to a suspension as provided by ORS 471.322, if the commission finds or has
reasonable ground to believe any of the following to be true:
(a) That the licensee:
(A) Has violated any provision of this chapter  or ORS 474.115 or any rule of the commission
adopted pursuant thereto.
(B) Has made any false representation or statement to the commission in order to induce  or
prevent action by the commission.
(C) Is not maintaining an acceptable bond as  required by ORS 471.311 or is not maintaining the
insurance or bond required by ORS 471.168.
(D) Has maintained an insanitary establishment.
(E) Is insolvent  or incompetent or physically unable to carry on the management of the estab-
lishment of the licensee.
(F) Is in the habit of using alcoholic liquor, habit-forming drugs or  controlled substances to ex-
cess.
(G) Has knowingly sold alcoholic liquor to persons under 21 years of age or  to persons visibly
intoxicated at the time of sale.
(H) Has allowed the consumption of  alcoholic liquor on the licensed premises by a person who
is visibly intoxicated at the time of consumption.
(I) Has misrepresented to a customer or the public any alcoholic liquor sold by the licensee.
(J) Since the granting of the license, has been convicted of a felony, of violating any of the liq-
uor laws of this state, general or  local, or of any misdemeanor or violation of any municipal ordi-
nance committed on the licensed premises.
(b) That any person  licensed to sell at retail for consumption on the premises is acting as an
agent of, or is a manufacturer or wholesaler  of alcoholic liquors, or has borrowed money or prop-
erty, or has accepted gratuities or rebates, or has obtained the use of  equipment from any man-
ufacturer or wholesaler of alcoholic liquor or any agent thereof.
(c) That there is a history of serious and  persistent problems involving disturbances, lewd or
unlawful activities or  noise either in the premises or involving patrons of the establishment in the
immediate vicinity of the premises  if the activities in the immediate vicinity of the premises are
related to the sale or service of alcohol  under the exercise of the license privilege. Behavior that
is grounds for cancellation  or suspension of a license under this section, where so related to the sale
or service of alcohol, includes but is not limited to obtrusive or excessive noise, music or sound vi-
brations; public drunkenness; fights; altercations; harassment or unlawful drug sales;  alcohol or re-
lated litter; trespassing on private property;  and public urination. Mitigating factors include a
showing by the  licensee that the problems are not serious or persistent or that the licensee has
demonstrated a willingness and ability to control adequately the licensed premises  and patrons’ be-
havior in the immediate vicinity of the premises which is related to the licensee’s sale or  service
of alcohol under the licensee’s exercise of the license privilege.
(d) That there is any other reason that,  in the opinion of the commission, based on public con-
venience or necessity, warrants canceling or suspending such license.
(2) Civil penalties under this section shall be imposed as provided in ORS 183.745.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 471.370 is amended to read:
471.370. Unless sooner suspended or revoked,  a service permit expires five years after the date
[on which the  permittee completed the approved alcohol server education course under ORS 471.542
that qualified the permittee for  the permit ] the Oregon Liquor Control Commission issues the
permit.
SECTION 14.  ORS 471.375 is amended to read:
471.375. (1) Any person who has not had a permit refused  or revoked or whose permit is not
under suspension may mix, sell or  serve alcoholic beverages as provided under subsection [ (4)] (3)
of this section if  the person prepares in duplicate an application for a service permit prior to mixing,
selling or serving any alcoholic beverage for  consumption on licensed premises . [and the application
is indorsed as required  under subsection (2) of this section. A copy of the indorsed application must
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-B) Page 11
be kept  on the licensed premises by any licensee for whom the person mixes, sells or serves alcoholic
beverages and must be made available for immediate inspection by any regulatory  specialist or by any
other peace officer until the applicant receives the service permit. ] Until a person  who has prepared
an application under this subsection receives a service permit, the licensee for the premises
shall make a copy of the application available  for immediate inspection by any regulatory
specialist or by any other peace officer.
[(2) An application for a service permit under subsection (1) of this section must be indorsed  by
one of the following persons: ]
[(a) The licensee under whose license the applicant will  mix, sell or serve alcoholic beverages. If
a licensee indorses an application, the licensee  must immediately transmit the application to the com-
mission with the fee required by subsection (3) of this section. ]
[(b) An officer or employee of a company that provides servers to licensees on a temporary  basis.
The commission must give a  company written approval to indorse service permit applications before
an application may be indorsed under this paragraph. ]
[(c) An employee of the commission designated by the commission to accept and indorse applica-
tions under this section. The applicant must personally appear before the employee of  the commission
and provide identification as may be required by commission rule. ]
[(d) An employee of an alcohol server education course provider that has been certified by  the
commission under ORS 471.542 (8). The employee must be specifically  designated by the provider to
indorse applications under this section. ]
[(3)] (2)  An applicant for  a service permit must be 18 years of age or over. Application for a
service permit shall be made on a form [ supplied by the ] acceptable to the Oregon Liquor  Control
Commission. The applicant shall truly answer all questions, provide  any further information
required[,] and pay  a fee not to exceed [ $10] $50. The commission shall either set the fee to cover
only the administrative costs of the service  permit program, or apply any excess to the Alcohol
Education Program established under ORS 471.541.
[(4)] (3)  An applicant [for a service permit whose application has been indorsed as provided
under] described in subsection (1) of this section may:
(a) Participate in the  mixing, selling or service of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the
premises where served or sold; and
(b) Participate in the dispensing of malt beverages,  wine or cider sold in securely covered con-
tainers provided by the consumer.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 471.380 is amended to read:
471.380. (1) The Oregon Liquor  Control Commission may refuse to grant a service permit if it
has reasonable grounds to believe any of the following to be true:
(a) That the applicant is in the habit of using alcoholic  beverages or controlled substances to
excess.
(b) That the applicant has made false statements to the commission.
(c) That the applicant is incompetent or physically incapable of  performing the duties of a
permittee.
(d) That the applicant has been convicted of violating any of the alcoholic  liquor laws of this
state, general or local, or has been convicted at any time of a felony.
[(e) That the application has not been indorsed as required by ORS 471.375. ]
[(f)] (e)  That the applicant has not completed the alcohol server education course and  exam-
ination required by ORS 471.542.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 183.435, an applicant who  seeks review of the refusal of a service
permit must request a hearing:
(a) Within 15 days after notification of the refusal, if  the refusal is based on failure to complete
the alcohol server education course and examination; or
(b) Within 30 days after notification of the refusal, if the refusal is based on any grounds  other
than failure to complete the alcohol server education course and examination.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 471.385 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-B) Page 12
471.385. (1) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission may revoke  or suspend a service permit, or
impose a civil penalty in lieu of or in addition to suspension as provided by ORS 471.322, if  it finds
or has reasonable grounds to believe any of the following to be true:
(a) That the permittee has made false statements to the commission.
(b) That the permittee has been convicted of a felony, of violating any of the liquor  laws of the
state, general or local, or any misdemeanor or violation  of any municipal ordinance committed on
the licensed premises.
(c) That the permittee  has performed or permitted any act which would constitute a violation
of any provision of this  chapter or any rule of the commission, if the act were performed or per-
mitted by any licensee of the commission.
(2) The issuance,  suspension or revocation of a permit under ORS 471.360 to 471.390 does not
relieve a licensee from responsibility for any act of an employee on the licensee’s premises.
(3) When there has been a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted thereunder  upon any
premises licensed  by the commission, the commission may revoke or suspend either the service
permit of the employee  who violated the law or rule or the license of the licensee upon whose
premises the violation occurred, or both the permit and the license.
[(4) The commission may revoke or suspend any license issued by the commission if the licensee
knowingly indorses a person’s application for a permit when the person has  been refused a permit or
has had a permit suspended or revoked, or when the licensee fails to comply with  any provision to be
performed by the licensee under ORS 471.360 to 471.390. ]
[(5)] (4) Civil penalties under this section shall be imposed as provided in ORS 183.745.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 471.805 is amended to read:
471.805. (1) Except as otherwise provided  in subsection (3) of this section and  ORS 471.810 (2),
all money collected by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission under this chapter and ORS  chapter
473 and privilege taxes shall be remitted to the State Treasurer who shall  credit it to a suspense
account of the commission. Whenever the commission determines that moneys have been received
by it in excess of the amount legally due and payable to the commission or that it has  received
money to which it has no  legal interest, or that any license fee or deposit is properly refundable,
the commission is authorized and directed to refund such money by check drawn upon the State
Treasurer and charged to the suspense  account of the commission. After withholding refundable li-
cense  fees  and such sum, not to exceed $250,000, as it considers necessary as a revolving fund for
a working cash balance  for the purpose of paying travel expenses, advances, other miscellaneous
bills and extraordinary items which are payable in cash immediately upon presentation,  the com-
mission shall  direct the State Treasurer to transfer the money remaining in the suspense account
to the Oregon Liquor Control Commission Account in the General Fund. Moneys in  the Oregon
Liquor Control Commission Account are continuously appropriated to the commission to be  distrib-
uted and used as required or allowed by law.
(2) All  necessary expenditures of the commission incurred in carrying out the purposes required
of the commission by law, including the  salaries of its employees, purchases made by the commission
and such sums necessary to  reimburse the $250,000 revolving fund, shall be audited and paid from
the Oregon Liquor Control Commission Account in the General Fund,  upon warrants drawn by the
Oregon  Department  of Administrative Services, pursuant to claims duly approved by the commission.
(3) Moneys from the retail sale of distilled liquor that are being held  by an agent ap-
pointed under ORS 471.750 or by a distillery  retail outlet agent appointed under ORS 471.230
are not subject to ORS 295.001 to 295.108 if the  agent has on deposit with the commission an
amount equalling or exceeding an amount the  commission, in its discretion, deems to be
reasonable and sufficient and to  be not less than the average daily gross receipts from retail
sales of distilled liquor by the agent. The commission shall remit moneys deposited with  the
commission under this subsection to the State Treasurer for deposit to a separate reserve
account of the commission. Moneys in the reserve account are not revenue of the commis-
sion for purposes of ORS  221.770. The commission shall return the deposit, and any interest
earned on the deposit, if the appointment of the  agent terminates and the agent has for-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-B) Page 13
warded to the commission all moneys  owed the commission from retail sales of distilled liq-
uor by the agent.
SECTION 18. ORS 471.390 is repealed.
SECTION 19. (1) Section 2 of this 2017 Act applies to  certificates, licenses, permits and
other authorizations lapsing, suspended or revoked before,  on or after the effective date of
this 2017 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 471.370 by section 13 of this 2017 Act apply to service permits
issued on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
(3) The amendments to ORS 471.375, 471.380 and 471.385 by sections 14 to 16  of this 2017
Act apply to service permit applications  received by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission
on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 20. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate April 26, 2017
Repassed by Senate June 22, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 13, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1044 (SB 1044-B) Page 14